test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vuajdnet_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vuäjdnet: # Verb 'see'
     vuäjdnet+V+Inf: vuäjdnet
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuojnáv
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuojná
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuajdná
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vujdnin
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vuäjdnebehtin, vuäjdnebähtten]
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [vuäjdneba, vuäjdneban]
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuäjdnep
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vuäjdnebehtit, vuäjdnebähttet]
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vujdni

     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vujdniv
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vujdni
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vujnij
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vujnijmen
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vujnijden
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vujnijga, vujnijgan]
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vujnijme
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vujnijde
     vuäjdnet+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vujdnin

     vuäjdnet+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuojne  
     vuäjdnet+V+Imprt+Du2: vuäjdnen
     vuäjdnet+V+Imprt+Pl2: vujdnit

     vuäjdnet+V+ConNeg: vuojne 
     vuäjdnet+V+GerII: vuäjdnemin
     vuäjdnet+V+PrfPrc: vuajdnám

#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Sg1: vujnitjav
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Sg2: vujnitja
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Sg3: vujnitj
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Du1: vujnitjin
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Du2: [vujnitjiehpen, vujnitjähppen] 
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Du3: vujnitjiebá
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Pl1: vujnitjip
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Pl2: vujnitjihpit
#     vuäjdnet+V+Pot+Pl3: vujnitji
